Utah statutes.
48-3a-111.   Registered agent.

(1)  Each limited liability company and each registered foreign limited liability company shall designate in accordance with Subsection 16-17-203(1) and maintain a registered agent in this state.

(2)  A limited liability company or registered foreign limited liability company may change its registered agent or the address of its registered agent by filing with the division a statement of change in accordance with Section 16-17-206.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

